Nevada, session 83, AB62.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 360.867 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.867 1. On behalf of a project, the project sponsor may
apply to the Division for a certificate of eligibility for transferable
tax credits which may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapter 363A or 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. To apply for a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits, the project sponsor must:
(a) Submit an application on a form prescribed by the Division;
and
(b) Comply with the requirements to obtain an allocation of
federal low-income housing tax credits which are set forth in the
qualified allocation plan.
-
*AB62*

– 3 –
3. The Division shall:
(a) Review each application for a certificate of eligibility for
transferable tax credits submitted pursuant to subsection 2 and any
supporting documents to determine whether the requirements for
eligibility for a reservation of transferable tax credits are met and the
amount of transferable tax credit threshold points awarded to the
project;
(b) Determine the amount of transferable tax credits for which
the project may be eligible, which amount must equal the amount
determined by the Division to be necessary to make the project
financially feasible after considering all other sources of financing
for the project; and
(c) Reserve the amount of transferable tax credits for which each
project is determined to be eligible pursuant to paragraph (b) in the
order of the amount of transferable tax credit threshold points
awarded to each such project pursuant to paragraph (a) until a
reservation is made for each project or the amount of transferable
credits reserved for the fiscal year is equal to the amount of
transferable tax credits which the Division is authorized to approve
for the fiscal year pursuant to NRS 360.868, whichever occurs first.
If the amount of transferable tax credits reserved for the fiscal year
reaches the amount of transferable tax credits which the Division is
authorized to approve for the fiscal year pursuant to NRS 360.868
before each eligible project is reserved the full amount of
transferable tax credits for which it is determined to be eligible
pursuant to paragraph (b), the Division may take any action that the
Division determines will ensure the maximum development of
affordable housing in this State, including, without limitation,
proportionally reducing the reservation of each project for which
transferable tax credits are reserved or reserving for the last project
to receive a reservation of transferable tax credits an amount of
transferable tax credits that is less than the full amount of
transferable tax credits for which the project was determined to be
eligible pursuant to paragraph (b).
4. If the Division reserves transferable tax credits for a project
pursuant to subsection 3, the Division shall provide written notice of
the reservation which identifies the amount of the tax credits
reserved for the project to:
(a) The project sponsor;
(b) The Department;
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board;
(d) The Office of Finance; and
(e) The Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau.
5. The Division:
-
*AB62*

– 4 –
(a) Shall terminate a reservation of transferable tax credits if the
project for which the reservation is awarded is not closed within
the period specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 6 unless, before
the expiration of that period, the Division receives from the project
sponsor a written request for an extension of not more than 45 days.
The Division may grant only one extension pursuant to this
paragraph and, if the project is not closed before the expiration of
the extension period, the Division must terminate the reservation of
transferable tax credits. A request for an extension submitted
pursuant to this paragraph must be accompanied by proof
satisfactory to the Division that:
(1) The requirements for financing the project have been
substantially completed;
(2) The delay in closing was the result of circumstances that
could not have been anticipated by and were outside the control of
the project sponsor at the time the application was submitted by the
project sponsor; and
(3) The project will be closed not later than 45 days after the
Division receives the request.
(b) May terminate a reservation of transferable tax credits if the
Division determines that any event, circumstance or condition
occurs for which a reservation of federal low-income housing tax
credits may be terminated. If transferable tax credits are terminated
pursuant to this paragraph, the Division may issue a reservation for
the amount of transferable tax credits terminated to other projects
eligible for transferable tax credits in the order of the amount of
transferable tax credit threshold points awarded to each such project
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 3.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, to be issued
transferable tax credits:
(a) Not later than 270 days after the Division provides written
notice of the reservation of transferable tax credits pursuant to
subsection 4, the project sponsor must demonstrate to the Division
that the project has been closed by providing proof satisfactory to
the Division that the project sponsor has:
(1) Purchased and holds title in fee simple to , or has entered
into a long-term ground lease for, the project site in the name of
the project sponsor.
(2) Entered into a written agreement with a contractor who is
licensed in this State to begin construction.
(3) Obtained adequate financing for the construction of the
project. The applicant must provide written commitments or
contracts from third parties.
(4) Executed a written commitment for a loan for permanent
financing for the construction of the project in an amount that
-
*AB62*

– 5 –
ensures the financial feasibility of the project. The commitment may
be subject to the condition that the construction is completed and the
project is appraised for an amount sufficient to justify the loan in
accordance with the requirements of the lender for credit. If the
project is a rural development project that receives loans or grants
from the United States Department of Agriculture, the applicant
must provide a form approved by the Division that indicates that
money has been obligated for the construction of the project before
the expiration of the period. An advance of that money is not
required before the expiration of the period.
(b) Not less than [45] 15 days before the project is closed, the
project sponsor must submit to the Division a final application for
transferable tax credits on a form provided by the Division and such
other information as the Division deems necessary to determine
whether the project qualifies for the issuance of transferable tax
credits. Upon receipt of a final application pursuant to this
paragraph, the Division shall complete a review of the project and
the project sponsor. If, after such review, the Division determines
that the project complies with the requirements upon which
transferable tax credits were reserved pursuant to this section and a
declaration of restrictive covenants and conditions will be recorded
in the office of the county recorder for the county in which the
project is located:
(1) The Division shall:
(I) Determine the appropriate amount of transferable tax
credits for the project, which must be the amount the Division
determines is necessary to make the project financially feasible after
all other sources of funding are allocated and paid toward the final
cost of the project and may not exceed the amount of transferable
tax credits reserved for the project pursuant to this section; and
(II) Notify the project sponsor that the transferable tax
credits will be issued;
(2) Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the project
sponsor shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
transferable tax credits that will be applied to each fee or tax set
forth in subsection 1, thereby accounting for all of the credits which
will be issued; and
(3) Upon receipt of the declaration described in subparagraph
(2), the Division shall issue transferable tax credits to the project
sponsor in the amount approved by the Division. The project
sponsor may transfer the transferable tax credits to a member or
partner of the project sponsor or to any other entity. The project
sponsor shall notify the Division upon transferring any transferable
tax credits. An entity to which a project sponsor transfers any
transferable tax credits may transfer those transferable tax credits to
-
*AB62*

– 6 –
one or more of its subsidiaries or affiliates and shall notify the
Division upon making any such transfer. The Division shall notify
the Department of Taxation, the Office of Finance, the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau and the
Nevada Gaming Control Board of all transferable tax credits issued,
segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, and of all
transferable tax credits transferred, segregated by each fee or tax set
forth in subsection 1.
7. Upon completion of the project, the project sponsor shall
submit to the Division a certification of costs on a form provided by
the Division and such other information as the Division deems
necessary to determine the final cost of the project. If, based upon
the final cost of the project indicated in the certification of costs, the
Division determines that the amount of transferable tax credits
issued by the Division to the project sponsor is greater than the
amount of transferable tax credits to which the project sponsor is
entitled:
(a) The Division shall notify the project sponsor, the Department
of Taxation, the Office of Finance, the Fiscal Analysis Division of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau and the Nevada Gaming Control
Board that the project sponsor is required to repay the portion of the
transferable tax credits to which the project sponsor is not entitled.
The notice must specify the amount of transferable tax credits that
the project sponsor is required to repay.
(b) The project sponsor shall repay to the Department of
Taxation or the Nevada Gaming Control Board, as applicable, the
portion of the transferable tax credits to which the project sponsor is
not entitled.
8. The project sponsor may submit a request to the
Administrator of the Division to protect from disclosure any
information in the application which, under generally accepted
business practices, would be considered a trade secret or other
confidential proprietary information of the business. After
consulting with the business, the Administrator of the Division shall
determine whether to protect the information from disclosure. The
decision of the Administrator of the Division is final and is not
subject to judicial review. If the Administrator of the Division
determines to protect the information from disclosure, the protected
information:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record;
(c) Must be redacted by the Administrator of the Division from
any copy of the application that is disclosed to the public; and
-
*AB62*

– 7 –
(d) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Division unless the lead participant consents to the
disclosure.
9. The Division may adopt any regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 360.860 to 360.870, inclusive.
10. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which
transferable tax credits described in this section will be
administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 360.860 to 360.870, inclusive.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliate” means a person who, directly or indirectly
through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is
under common control with a specified person.
(b) “Certification of costs” means a report from an independent
certified public accountant attesting:
(1) To the amount of the actual costs of construction of the
project; and
(2) That those costs may be included in the eligible basis of
the project pursuant to the provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 42.
(c) “Subsidiary” means an entity in which a person owns
beneficially or of record 50 percent or more of the outstanding
equity interests.
(d) “Transferable tax credit threshold points” means points
awarded based on specific objectives determined by the Division
through the dissemination of a strategic plan for the development of
affordable housing created by the Division, the review of housing
data and the receipt of input from persons interested in the
development of affordable housing.
Sec. 2. NRS 360.868 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.868 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the Division shall not approve any application for transferable tax
credits submitted pursuant to NRS 360.867 if:
(a) Approval of the application would cause the total amount of
transferable tax credits approved pursuant to NRS 360.867 for each
fiscal year to exceed $10,000,000. Any portion of the $10,000,000
per fiscal year for which transferable tax credits have not previously
been approved may be carried forward and made available for
approval during the next or any future fiscal year. If the Division
determines that approval of an application that would cause the total
amount of transferable tax credits approved pursuant to NRS
360.867 in a fiscal year to exceed $10,000,000 is necessary to
ensure the maximum development of affordable housing in this
-
*AB62*

– 8 –
State through the approval of transferable tax credits pursuant to
NRS 360.867, the Division may approve the application unless the
approval of the application would cause the total amount of
transferable tax credits approved pursuant to NRS 360.867 in the
fiscal year to exceed $13,000,000. If the Division approves an
application for transferable tax credits that causes the total amount
of transferable tax credits approved pursuant to NRS 360.867 in a
fiscal year to exceed $10,000,000, the Division must reduce the
amount of transferable tax credits which may be approved pursuant
to NRS 360.867 in the next fiscal year by the amount of transferable
tax credits approved in excess of $10,000,000 in the previous fiscal
year. Any reduction made pursuant to this paragraph to the
amount of transferable tax credits which may be approved
pursuant to NRS 360.867 in a fiscal year must be made to the
amount of carried forward transferable tax credits available for
approval in a fiscal year before the amount of transferable tax
credits which may be approved in a fiscal year is reduced below
$10,000,000.
(b) Approval of the application would cause the total amount of
transferable tax credits approved for all fiscal years pursuant to NRS
360.867 to exceed [$40,000,000.] $100,000,000.
2. The transferable tax credits issued to a project sponsor
pursuant to NRS 360.867 expire 4 years after the date on which the
Division notifies the project sponsor that the transferable tax
credits [are] will be issued [to the project sponsor.] as required by
subsection 6 of NRS 360.867.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB62*